District of Columbia statutes.
22-2704

Abducting or enticing child from his or her home for purposes of prostitution; harboring such child.

(a)

It is unlawful for any person, for purposes of prostitution, to:

(1)

Persuade, entice, or forcibly abduct a child under 18 years of age from his or her home or usual abode, or from the custody and control of the child’s parents or guardian; or

(2)

Secrete or harbor any child so persuaded, enticed, or abducted from his or her home or usual abode, or from the custody and control of the child’s parents or guardian.

(b)

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than 20 years, or by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1322, ch. 854, § 813
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 2(q), 41 DCR 1639
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 213, 53 DCR 8610
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(g), 60 DCR 2064

Cross References

Armed offenses, additional penalty for committing crime when armed, see §§ 22-4501 and 22-4502.
Child witness testimony, exception from corroboration requirement, see § 23-114.
Criminal offense against a victim who is a minor defined, violations of this section see § 24-4101.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 14-311, § 22-1831, § 22-2701.01, § 22-2731, § 22-3020.51, § 22-4001, § 23-113, and § 42-3101.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-2704.
1973 Ed., § 22-2704.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-306 rewrote the section, which had previously read:
“Any person who, for purposes of prostitution, persuades, entices, or forcibly abducts a child under 16 years of age from his or her home or usual abode, or from the custody and control of the child’s parents or guardian, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than 2 years and not more than 20 years; and whoever knowingly secretes or harbors any child so persuaded, enticed, or abducted shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than 8 years.”
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $20,000” in (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 213 of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 213 of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 213 of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 213 of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(g) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.